District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.03

Cooperation and communication among courts.

Sections 16-4601.10 , 16-4601.11 , and 16-4601.12 apply to cooperation and communications among courts in proceedings under this subchapter.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.